Mississippi statutes. Title 13. Evidence, Process and Juries
Chapter 3. Process, Notice, and Publication

§ 13-3-1.
Provisions of chapter applicable to all courts.

The law of process as declared in this chapter, except where its provisions are provided for by the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure or by the nature of the subject matter, shall govern in all courts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3501; 1906, § 3999; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3006; 1930, § 3052; 1942, § 1940; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 13-3-3.
Style and date of process.

The style of all process shall be, “The State of Mississippi.” It shall not be necessary that any process bear teste in the name of any judge or of any term of the court, but all process, except where otherwise provided, shall be issued and signed by the clerk of the court, with the seal of his office affixed, and shall bear date of the day on which the process shall be issued.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 58, art. 1 (20); 1857, ch. 61, art. 60, ch. 62, art. 26; 1871, §§ 689, 1002; 1880, § 2284; 1892, § 3413; 1906, § 3912; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2919; 1930, § 2964; 1942, § 1844.

§ 13-3-5.
The summons.

The process to bring in defendants in all civil actions in all courts except justice court shall be a summons, the form, issuance, service, waiver, return, amendment and time limits of which shall be governed by the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure.

The process to bring in defendants in all civil actions in justice court shall be a summons which shall be served in one of the following modes:

First.— Upon the defendant personally, if to be found in the county, by handing him a true copy of the process.

Second.— If the defendant cannot himself be found in the county, then by leaving a true copy of the process at his usual place of abode, with his wife or some other person of his family above the age of sixteen (16) years, and willing to receive such copy.

Third.— If the defendant cannot himself be found, and if no person of his family aged sixteen (16) years can be found at his usual place of abode who is willing to receive such copy, then by posting a true copy on a door of the defendant’s usual place of abode; provided, however, that if this mode is used when the defendant’s usual place of abode is a multi-family dwelling, a copy of the summons shall be mailed to the defendant by the clerk of the court upon return of service.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, §§ 693, 1001; 1880, §§ 1523, 1848; 1892, § 3414; 1906, § 3913; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2920; 1930, § 2965; 1942, § 1845; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 93; Laws, 1992, ch. 427 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 4, 1992).

§§ 13-3-7 through 13-3-13.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§13-3-7. [Codes, 1857, ch. 62, art. 29; 1871, § 1008; 1880, § 1853; 1892, § 3415; 1906, § 3914; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2921; 1930, § 2966; 1942, § 1846]

§13-3-9. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 58, art. 1 (24); 1857, ch. 61, art. 66; 1871, § 697; 1880, § 1524; 1892, § 3416; 1906, § 3915; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2922; 1930, § 2967; 1942, § 1847]

§13-3-11. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 58, art. 1 (20); 1857, ch. 61, art. 62; 1871, § 695; 1880, § 1525; 1892, § 3417; 1906, § 3916; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2923; 1930, § 2968; 1942, § 1848]

§13-3-13. [Codes, 1857, ch. 62, art. 26; 1871, § 1005; 1880, § 1848; 1892, § 3418; 1906, § 3917; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2924; 1930, § 2969; 1942, § 1849: Laws, 1924, ch. 151]

§ 13-3-15.
Separate or additional summons; attachment against estate of defendant.

Upon the request of the plaintiff, separate or additional summons shall issue against any defendants. When the defendant shall not be found, the plaintiff may have an attachment against the estate of the defendant. If, upon such attachment, the sheriff shall seize or attach any property of the defendant, the same proceedings shall thereafter be had as if the suit had been originally commenced by attachment.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 58, art. 1 (40); 1857, ch. 61, art. 67; 1871, § 718; 1880, §§ 1534, 1851; 1892, § 3419; 1906, § 3918; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2925; 1930, § 2970; 1942, § 1850; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 94, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 13-3-17.
Substitution of parties in case of death of party.

Substitution of parties in case of death of a party shall be governed by the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure.

HISTORY:
[Codes, 1857, ch. 62, art. 32; 1871, § 1072; 1880, § 1852; 1892, § 3420; 1906, § 3919; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2926; 1930, § 2971; 1942, § 1851.]; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 95, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§§ 13-3-19 through 13-3-23.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§13-3-19. [Codes, 1857, ch. 62, art. 34; 1871, § 1013; 1880, § 1855; 1892, § 3421; 1906, § 3920; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2927; 1930, § 2972; 1942, § 1852; Laws, 1924, ch. 151; Laws, 1946, ch. 170]

§13-3-21. [Codes, 1857, ch. 62, art. 34; 1871, § 1013; 1880, § 1856; 1892, § 3422; 1906, § 3921; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2928; 1930, § 2973; 1942, § 1853]

§13-3-23. [Codes 1880, § 1857; 1892, § 3423; 1906, § 3922; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2929; 1930, § 2974; 1942, § 1854]

§ 13-3-25.
Summons by publication for unknown heirs and unknown defendants.

When unknown heirs are made parties defendant in any proceeding in the chancery court, upon affidavit that the names of such heirs are unknown, the complainant may have publication of summons for them and such proceedings shall be had thereupon in all respects as are authorized in the case of a nonresident defendant. When the parties in interest are unknown, and affidavit of that fact be filed, they may be made parties by publication to them as unknown parties in interest.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 62, art. 35; 1871, § 1069; 1880, § 1858; 1892, § 3424; 1906, § 3923; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2930; 1930, § 2975; 1942, § 1855.

§ 13-3-27.
Publication of summons.

Publication of summons in all cases and in every court, when authorized by law, shall be made as prescribed in the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3425; 1906, § 3924; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2931; 1930, § 2976; 1942, § 1856; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 96, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 13-3-29.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

[Codes, 1880, § 462; 1892, § 3426; 1906, § 3925; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2932; 1930, § 2977; 1942, § 1857]

§ 13-3-31.
Publication; requirements and procedures.

Whenever it is required by law that any summons, order, citation, advertisement or other legal notice shall be published in a newspaper in this state, it shall mean, in addition to any other requirements imposed by law, publication in some newspaper which:

Maintains a general circulation predominantly to bona fide paying subscribers within the political subdivision within which publication of such legal notice is required. The term “general circulation” means numerically substantial, geographically widespread, demographically diversified circulation to bona fide paying subscribers. In no event shall the term “general circulation” be interpreted to require that legal notices be published in a newspaper having the greatest circulation. The term “bona fide paying subscribers” means persons who have subscribed at a subscription rate which is not nominal, whether by mail subscriptions, purchases through dealers and carriers, street vendors and counter sellers, or any combination thereof, but shall not include free circulation, sales at a token or nominal subscription price and sales in bulk for purposes other than for resale for individual subscribers.

Maintains a legitimate list of its bona fide paying subscribers by the following categories where applicable:

Mail subscribers;

Dealers and carriers; and

Street vendors and counter sellers.

Is not published primarily for advertising purposes and has not contained more than seventy-five percent (75%) advertising in more than one-half (1/2) of its issues during the period of twelve (12) months next prior to the first publication of any legal notice therein, excluding separate advertising supplements inserted into but separately identifiable from any regular issue or issues.

Has been established and published continuously for at least twelve (12) months next prior to the first publication of such matter to be published, is regularly issued at stated intervals no less frequently than once a week, bears a date of issue, and is numbered consecutively; provided, however, that publication on legal holidays of this state or of the United States and on Saturdays and Sundays shall not be required, and failure to publish not more than two (2) regular issues in any calendar year shall not disqualify a paper otherwise qualified.

Is issued from a known office of publication, which shall be the principal public business office of the newspaper and need not be the place at which the newspaper’s printing presses are physically located. A newspaper shall be deemed to be “published” at the place where its known office of publication is located.

Is formed of printed sheets. However, the word “printed” does not include reproduction by the stencil, mimeograph or hectograph process.

Is originated and published for the dissemination of current news and intelligence of varied, broad and general public interest, announcements and notices, opinions as editorials on a regular or irregular basis, and advertising and miscellaneous reading matter.

Is not designed primarily for free circulation or for circulation at nominal rates.

“Newspaper,” as used in this section, shall not include a newspaper, publication, or periodical which is published, sponsored by, is directly supported financially by, or is published to further the interests of, or is directed to, or has a circulation restricted in whole or in part to any particular sect, denomination, labor or fraternal organization or other special group or class of citizens, or which primarily contains information of a specialized nature rather than information of varied, broad and general interest to the general public, or which is directed to any particular geographical portion of any given political subdivision within which publication of such legal notice is required, rather than to such political subdivision as a whole. No newspaper otherwise qualified under this section shall be disqualified from publishing legal notices for the sole reason that such newspaper does not have as great a circulation as some other newspaper publishing in the same political subdivision.

In the event of the discontinuance of the publication of all newspapers in any county qualified under this section to publish legal notices, any other such newspaper published in the same county, regardless of the length of time it has been published, shall be deemed qualified to publish such legal notices, provided such newspaper meets all requirements of this section other than the requirements of subsection (1) (d) of this section.

A newspaper otherwise qualified under this section which is published in a municipality whose corporate limits encompass territory in more than one (1) county shall be qualified to publish legal notices, including foreclosure sale notices as described in Section 89-1-55, for any county a portion of whose territory is included within the municipality, irrespective of the actual physical location within the municipality of the principal public business office of the newspaper.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1858; Laws, 1936, ch. 313; Laws, 1948, ch. 427; Laws, 1976, ch. 479, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 400; Laws, 2004, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 28, 2004).

§ 13-3-32.
Publication—in what newspaper—presumption of continued qualification.

All newspapers which were qualified to publish legal notices and which were publishing legal notices prior to July 1, 1976, shall be presumed to qualify under Section 13-3-31 unless and until a determination has been made by competent authority that such newspaper fails to meet the requirements and provisions of Section 13-3-31.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 479, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§§ 13-3-33 and 13-3-35.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§13-3-33. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 58, art. 1 (44); 1857, ch. 61, art. 64; 1871, § 701; 1880, § 1527; 1892, § 3427; 1906, § 3926; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2933; 1930, § 2978; 1942, § 1859]

§13-3-35. [Codes, 1892, § 3428; 1906, § 3927; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2934; 1930, § 2980; 1942, § 1861]

§ 13-3-37.
Sheriff to mark and return process.

The sheriff shall mark on all process the day of the receipt thereof by him, and he shall return the same promptly and in any event within the time during which the person served must respond to the process, with a written statement of his proceedings thereon, and of his fees, for serving it. For failing to note the time of the receipt of process, or for failing to return the same, the sheriff shall forfeit to the party aggrieved the sum of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), and shall be liable for all damages, and the court may enforce return of the process by fine and imprisonment for contempt. Whenever a sheriff of any county shall receive from another county any writ or other process directed to him, he shall not be liable for a failure to return the same to the county from which the same was issued if he shall show to the court that he mailed the same in the post office, directed to the clerk of the court by whom the same was issued, at least two (2) days before the sitting of the court to which the same was returnable.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 63; 1871, § 700; 1880, § 1526; 1892, § 3429; 1906, § 3928; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2935; 1930, § 2981; 1942, § 1862; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 97, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 13-3-39.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

[Codes, 1942, § 2910-09; Laws, 1962, ch. 257, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962)]

§ 13-3-41.
Service on one carrying on business in state by or through trustee or attorney in fact.

All persons, firms, copartnerships or corporations carrying on business in the State of Mississippi, by or through trustees or attorneys in fact, may be served with process in all suits or proceedings in any court, by serving a copy of such process upon an agent of such trustees or attorneys in fact, in the same manner as is now provided for service of process upon foreign corporations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2979; 1942, § 1860; Laws, 1924, ch. 185.

§§ 13-3-43 through 13-3-47.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§13-3-43. [Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 64; 1871, § 704; 1880, § 1530; 1892, § 3430; 1906, § 3929; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2936; 1930, § 2982; 1942, § 1863]

§13-3-45. [Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 64; 1871, § 705; 1880, § 1531; 1892, § 3431; 1906, § 3930; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2937; 1930, § 2983; 1942, § 1864]

§13-3-47. [Codes, 1892, § 3432; 1906, § 3931; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2938; 1930, § 2984; 1942, § 1865]

§ 13-3-49.
Service when defendant is a corporation.

If the defendant in any suit or legal proceeding be a corporation, process may be served on the president or other head of the corporation, upon the cashier, secretary, treasurer, clerk, or agent of the corporation, or upon any one of the directors of such corporation. If the defendant corporation be a sleeping-car company, process may be served upon any conductor thereof. If the defendant corporation be a steamboat company, process may be served upon the captain or other officer of a boat thereof. If no such person or persons be found in the county, then it shall be sufficient to post a true copy of the process on the door of the office or principal place of business of the corporation. In suits against railroads, sleeping-car, telegraph, telephone, express, steamboat, and insurance companies or corporations, or in suits against a receiver or receivers in charge of the property of any such companies or corporations, the process may be served on any agent of the defendant or sent to any county in which the office or principal place of business may be located, and there served as herein directed and authorized, or process may be served on any one of the foregoing officers of such corporation or company, and upon the secretary, cashier, treasurer, clerk, depot agent, attorney or any other officer or agent of such receiver or receivers, or upon them in person. When any writ or process against such corporation, company, receiver or receivers has been returned executed, the defendant or defendants shall be considered in court, and the action shall proceed as actions against natural persons. All process and notices to be served upon such companies, corporations, or receivers may be served as herein directed.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 15, art. 3 (1); 1857, ch. 61, art. 64; 1871, § 703; 1880, §§ 1035, 1529; 1892, § 3433; 1906, § 3932; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2939; 1930, § 2985; 1942, § 1866; Laws, 1894, ch. 61.

§ 13-3-51.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

[Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 64; 1871, § 706; 1880, § 1532; 1892, § 3434; 1906, § 3933; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2940; 1930, § 2986; 1942, § 1867]

§ 13-3-53.
Service on one of several executors or administrators.

If there be two or more executors or administrators of the same estate, if process cannot be served on all of them in suits against them, service on one shall be sufficient to authorize a judgment against all.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 60, art. 134; 1871, § 1192; 1880, § 1513; 1892, § 3435; 1906, § 3934; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2941; 1930, § 2987; 1942, § 1868.

§ 13-3-55.
Suits by or against partnerships; service on one of several partners.

A partnership may sue or be sued in the partnership name, or in the names of the individuals composing the partnership, or both and service of process on any partner shall be sufficient to maintain the suit against all the partners so as to bind the assets of the partnership and of the individual summoned.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1519; 1892, § 3436; 1906, § 3935; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2942; 1930, § 2988; 1942, § 1869; Laws, 1977, ch. 405, eff from and after April 1, 1977.

§ 13-3-57.
Service on nonresident business not qualified to do business in state; survival of cause of action in case of death or inability to act; service on nonresident executor, administrator, etc.

Any nonresident person, firm, general or limited partnership, or any foreign or other corporation not qualified under the Constitution and laws of this state as to doing business herein, who shall make a contract with a resident of this state to be performed in whole or in part by any party in this state, or who shall commit a tort in whole or in part in this state against a resident or nonresident of this state, or who shall do any business or perform any character of work or service in this state, shall by such act or acts be deemed to be doing business in Mississippi and shall thereby be subjected to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state. Service of summons and process upon the defendant shall be had or made as is provided by the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure.

Any such cause of action against any such nonresident, in the event of death or inability to act for itself or himself, shall survive against the executor, administrator, receiver, trustee, or any other selected or appointed representative of such nonresident. Service of process or summons may be had or made upon such nonresident executor, administrator, receiver, trustee or any other selected or appointed representative of such nonresident as is provided by the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure, and when such process or summons is served, made or had against the nonresident executor, administrator, receiver, trustee or other selected or appointed representative of such nonresident it shall be deemed sufficient service of such summons or process to give any court in this state in which such action may be filed, in accordance with the provisions of the statutes of the State of Mississippi or the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure, jurisdiction over the cause of action and over such nonresident executor, administrator, receiver, trustee or other selected or appointed representative of such nonresident insofar as such cause of action is involved.

The provisions of this section shall likewise apply to any person who is a nonresident at the time any action or proceeding is commenced against him even though said person was a resident at the time any action or proceeding accrued against him.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 1437, 1438; Laws, 1940, ch. 246; Laws, 1958, ch. 245, § 1; Laws, 1964, ch. 320, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 330, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 431, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 378, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 437; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 98, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§§ 13-3-59 and 13-3-61.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§13-3-59. [Codes, 1942, § 1439; Laws, 1940, ch. 246]

§13-3-61. [Codes, 1942, § 1440; Laws, 1940, ch. 246]

§ 13-3-63.
Service when defendant is nonresident motorist; appointment of secretary of state as agent.

The acceptance by a nonresident of the rights and privileges conferred by the provisions of this section, as evidenced by his operating, either in person or by agent or employee, a motor vehicle upon any public street, road or highway of this state, or elsewhere in this state, or the operation by a nonresident of a motor vehicle on any public street, road or highway of this state, or elsewhere in this state, other than under this section, shall be deemed equivalent to an appointment by such nonresident of the Secretary of State of the State of Mississippi to be his true and lawful attorney, upon whom may be served all lawful processes or summonses in any action or proceeding against him, growing out of any accident or collision in which said nonresident may be involved while operating a motor vehicle on such street, road or highway, or elsewhere in this state, and said acceptance or operation shall be a signification of his agreement that any such process or summons against him which is so served shall be of the same legal force and validity as if served on him personally. Service of such process or summons shall be made by the sheriff of Hinds County, upon prepayment of the fees to which he is entitled by law, by serving two (2) copies of the process or summons for each nonresident defendant, with a fee of Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) for each such defendant on the Secretary of State or by leaving two (2) copies of said process or summons with the fee in the office of the Secretary of State, and such service shall be service upon said nonresident defendant with the same force and effect as if such nonresident had been personally served with such process or summons within the State of Mississippi. One (1) of the copies of such process or summons shall be preserved by the Secretary of State as a record of his office. Notice of such service, together with a copy of the process or summons, shall be mailed forthwith as certified or registered mail, restricted for delivery to addressee only and with postage prepaid, by the Secretary of State to each such nonresident defendant at his last known address, which address shall be written on the process or summons upon the issuance thereof by the clerk of the court wherein the action is pending, or notice of such service and copy of process or summons actually shall be delivered to the said defendant. The defendant’s return receipt or evidence of defendant’s refusal to accept delivery of such certified or registered mail, in case such notice and copy of process or summons are sent by certified or registered mail, or affidavit of the person delivering such notice and copy of process or summons, in case such notice and copy of process or summons actually are delivered, shall be filed in the court wherein such action is pending before judgment can be entered against such nonresident defendant. The Secretary of State, upon receipt of such return receipt or evidence of the refusal of such defendant to accept delivery of such certified or registered mail, shall promptly return same to the clerk of the court wherein such action is pending, and the said clerk of the court shall promptly file and preserve same among the records of such action or proceeding. The court in which the action is pending may order such continuance as may be necessary to afford the defendant reasonable opportunity to defend the action.

Any cause of action arising out of such accident or collision against any such nonresident, in case of the death of such nonresident, shall survive against his administrator, executor or other personal representative of his estate, and service of all necessary and lawful process or summons, when had or obtained upon any such nonresident owner, nonresident operator or agent or employee, or upon the executor, administrator or other legal representative of the estate of such nonresident owner or nonresident operator, in the manner as hereinbefore provided, for the service of all lawful processes or summonses, herein, shall be deemed sufficient service of process or summons to give any court of this state, in which such action may be filed in accordance with the statutes of the State of Mississippi, jurisdiction over the cause of action and over the nonresident owner, nonresident operator or agent or employee, or the nonresident executor, or administrator of such nonresident owner or nonresident operator, defendant or defendants, and shall warrant and authorize personal judgment against such nonresident owner, nonresident operator, agent, employee, executor or administrator or other legal representative of the estate of such nonresident owner or nonresident operator, defendant or defendants, in the event the plaintiff in such cause of action shall prevail.

The agency or relationship created under the provisions of this section by and between the nonresident owner or nonresident operator of a motor vehicle operating upon the public road, street or highway of this state, or elsewhere in this state, as hereinbefore set forth, in the event of the death of such nonresident owner or nonresident operator of such motor vehicle, shall survive and continue and extend to his executor, administrator or other legal representative of his estate, and the Secretary of State of the State of Mississippi shall be in the same position and relationship with respect to the executor, administrator or other legal representative of the estate of such nonresident owner or nonresident operator of such motor vehicle, as he was in or would have been in with the nonresident owner or nonresident operator of said motor vehicle, had such nonresident owner or nonresident operator survived, and in any action arising or growing out of such accident or collision in which such nonresident owner or nonresident operator of a motor vehicle may be involved while operating a motor vehicle on such street, road or highway or elsewhere in this state, where the nonresident owner or nonresident operator of such motor vehicle has died prior to the commencement of an action against him because of or growing out of such accident or collision, service of process or summons may be had or made upon the nonresident executor, administrator or other legal representative of the estate of such nonresident owner or operator of the motor vehicle involved in such accident or collision, in the same manner and upon the same notice as hereinbefore provided in the case of process or summons upon the nonresident owner or nonresident operator of such motor vehicle. When such process or summons is served, made or had against the nonresident executor or administrator or such nonresident owner or such nonresident operator of such motor vehicle involved in such accident or collision, it shall be deemed sufficient service of such summons or process to give any court in this state in which such action may be filed, in accordance with the provisions of the statutes of the State of Mississippi, jurisdiction over the cause of action and over such nonresident executor or administrator of such nonresident owner or operator of such motor vehicle insofar as such cause of action is involved.

The provisions of this section shall likewise apply to any person who is a nonresident at the time any action or proceeding is commenced against him, even though said person was a resident at the time any action or proceeding accrued against him.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9352-61; Laws, 1938, chs. 148, 345; Laws, 1946, ch. 266, § 61; Laws, 1952, ch. 265, § 1; Laws, 1954, ch. 299, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1958, ch. 262; Laws, 1964, ch. 376, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1978, ch. 378, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 443, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§§ 13-3-65 and 13-3-67.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§13-3-65. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 58, art. 1 (43); 1857, ch. 61, art. 73; 1871, § 715; 1880, § 1535; 1892, § 3437; 1906, § 3936; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2943; 1930, § 2989; 1942, § 1870]

§13-3-67. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 58, art. 1 (95); 1857, ch. 61, art. 69; 1871, § 711; 1880, § 2285; 1892, § 3438; 1906, § 3937; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2944; 1930, § 2990; 1942, § 1871]

§ 13-3-69.
Process not void for certain defects.

If any matter required to be inserted in or indorsed on any process be omitted, such process shall not on that account be void, but it may be set aside as irregular, or amended on such terms as the court shall deem proper. The amendment may be made upon an application to set aside or quash the writ.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 70; 1871, § 712; 1880, § 2286; 1892, § 3439; 1906, § 3938; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2945; 1930, § 2991; 1942, § 1873.

§ 13-3-71.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

[Codes, 1942, § 1872; Laws, 1936, ch. 244; Laws, 1956, ch. 238; Laws, 1966, ch. 355, § 1; Laws 1981, ch. 358, § 1]

§ 13-3-73.
Plaintiff’s options when sheriff kept off by force.

When the sheriff shall return, on any process, that he has been kept off by force, the plaintiff may issue an alias or pluries, as the case may be, or he may proceed in the action against the defendant as if the process had been returned executed.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 58, art. 1 (41); 1857, ch. 61, art. 71; 1871, § 713; 1880, § 2287; 1892, § 3440; Laws, 1906, § 3939; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2946; Laws, 1930, § 2992; Laws, 1942, § 1874.

§ 13-3-75.
Return of alias where first writ served.

If any process be executed, and for want of a return thereof other process be issued, the sheriff or other officer shall not execute the subsequent process, but shall return the first process by him executed, if it be in his possession, and, if it be not in his possession, he shall return the subsequent process, with an indorsement of the execution of the first process, and how it was executed, on which there shall be the same proceedings as if the said first process had been duly returned.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 58, art. 1 (42); 1857, ch. 61, art. 72; 1871, § 714; 1880, § 2288; 1892, § 3441; 1906, § 3940; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2947; 1930, § 2993; 1942, § 1875.

§ 13-3-77.
Process may be executed by an officer out of his county.

The sheriff or other proper officer of a county may execute process out of his county, in case the person to be served or property to be seized was in the officer’s county when the writ was received, but had removed or been carried into another county before its execution. In such case the officer shall state the facts in his return, and the writ and return shall have the same effect as if the process had been returned not executed and a testatum or duplicate writ had been issued to and executed and returned by an officer of the county where served.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3500; 1906, § 3998; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3005; 1930, § 3051; 1942, § 1939.

§ 13-3-79.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

[Codes, 1880, § 2291; 1892, § 3443; 1906, § 3942; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2949; 1930, § 2995; 1942, § 1877; Laws, 1986, ch. 459, § 26]

§ 13-3-81.
When justice court judge may execute process.

If there be no sheriff in any county, or if good cause of exception exists against him, by reason of his being a party to or interested in the suit, or otherwise, the process may be directed to any justice court judge of the county, who shall be bound to execute the same, and to do all things which the sheriff would be bound to do if no exception existed against him. In case of any neglect or breach of such duty, the justice court judge shall be liable to the same penalties and subject to the same actions and remedies as sheriffs are subject to in like cases.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 75; 1871, § 699; 1880, § 2290; 1892, § 3445; 1906, § 3944; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2951; 1930, § 2997; 1942, § 1879; Laws, 1986, ch. 459, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 13-3-83.
Service of notices, summonses, subpoenas, orders, pleadings, motions, etc.

All notices provided for by law appertaining to actions, suits or proceedings of any kind in any court shall be served and returned by the sheriff or any constable of the county, or the marshal of any city, town or village therein in which such notices are to be served, to whom such notices may be delivered for that purpose. However, service of summonses and subpoenas in all courts except justice court shall be governed by the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure and in every instance, every order required by its terms to be served, every pleading subsequent to the original complaint unless the court otherwise orders because of numerous defendants, every paper relating to discovery required to be served upon a party unless the court otherwise orders, every written motion other than one which may be heard ex parte, and every written notice, appearance, demand, offer of judgment, designation of record on appeal and similar paper shall be served and filed in accordance with the provisions of the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 2289; 1892, § 3442; 1906, § 3941; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2948; 1930, § 2994; 1942, § 1876; Laws, 1971, ch. 353, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 99; Laws, 1992, ch. 427 § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 4, 1992).

§ 13-3-85.
Notice by summons of motions against officers for neglect of duty.

In all cases where motions are made against officers, or officers and their sureties, for neglect of official duty under any law, five days’ notice shall be given by summons, to be served as in other cases, and this shall apply to motions against the personal representative of a deceased officer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3444; 1906, § 3943; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2950; 1930, § 2996; 1942, § 1878.

§ 13-3-87.
Return of officer may be questioned by parties.

The return of the officer serving any process may, in the same action, be shown to be untrue by either of the parties, but the officer himself shall not be permitted to question its truth.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 65; 1871, § 707; 1880, § 1533; 1892, § 3446; 1906, § 3945; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2952; 1930, § 2998; 1942, § 1880.

§ 13-3-89.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

[Codes, 1892, § 3447; 1906, § 3946; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2953; 1930, § 2999; 1942, § 1881]

§ 13-3-91.
Reversal, on appeal by defendant, for want of service or defective service as an appearance.

Where a judgment or decree is reversed on appeal taken by defendant for the want of service, or because of defective service of process, a new summons or citation need not be issued or served, but the defendant shall, without such process or service, be presumed to have entered his appearance to the cause in the court from which the appeal was taken when the mandate shall be filed therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3448; 1906, § 3947; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2954; 1930, § 3000; 1942, § 1882.

§ 13-3-93.
Subpoenas for witnesses.

The first process, in all civil actions, and in all courts, to compel the attendance of a witness, shall be a subpoena, the procedural aspects of which shall be governed by the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 60, art. 1 (102); 1857, ch. 61, art. 194; 1871, § 761; 1880, § 1586; 1892, § 3449; 1906, § 3948; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2955; 1930, § 3001; 1942, § 1883; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 100, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§§ 13-3-95 through 13-3-101.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§13-3-95. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 60, art. 1 (119); 1857, ch. 61, art. 195; 1871,§ 762; 1880, §§ 1587, 1616; 1892, § 3450; 1906, § 3949; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2956; 1930, § 3002; 1942, § 1884.]

§13-3-97. [Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 195; 1871, § 763; 1880, § 1587; 1892, § 3451; 1906, § 3950; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2957; 1930, § 3003; 1942, § 1885.]

§13-3-99. [Codes, 1880, § 1594; 1892, § 3452; 1906, § 3951; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2958; 1930, § 3004; 1942, § 1886; Laws, 1936, ch. 250.]

§13-3-101. [Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 196; 1871, § 764; 1880, § 1588; 1892, § 3453; 1906, § 3952; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2959; 1930, § 3005; 1942, § 1887.]

§ 13-3-103.
Attachment for non-appearing subpoenaed witness.

If any person subpoenaed as a witness shall fail to appear and attend as required, an attachment shall be issued by order of the court or other authority before which he was subpoenaed to appear, returnable at such time as the court or authority may appoint. The court or authority shall, on ordering the attachment, direct whether the witness shall enter into bond for his appearance, and in what sum, and whether with or without sureties, which bond the sheriff, or other officer by whom the attachment is executed, is authorized to take, payable to the state. In case the witness shall appear in answer to the attachment, the court may discharge him therefrom, on good cause shown, or may require him to enter into recognizance or bond for his appearance until discharged, to testify in the cause. In case the witness shall not appear, in pursuance of his recognizance or bond, the same proceedings shall be had as upon the forfeiture of a recognizance in a criminal case.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 60, art. 1 (121); 1857, ch. 61, art. 197; 1871, § 765; 1880, § 1589; 1892, § 3454; 1906, § 3935; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2960; 1930, § 3006; 1942, § 1888.

§ 13-3-105.
Subpoenaed witness to attend until discharged; scire facias for defaulters.

Every witness subpoenaed in any case, civil or criminal, shall attend, from day to day, and from term to term without further notice, until discharged by the court or by the party at whose instance he was subpoenaed, and in default thereof he shall be fined by the court not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), and a scire facias shall issue thereon, requiring him to appear at the next term of the court, to show cause why the fine should not be made absolute. If cause be not then shown, the fine shall be made final. In criminal cases, the court may cause the witnesses on either side to be bound by bond or recognizance to appear and testify until discharged.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 60, art. 1 (103, 105); 1857, ch. 61, arts. 196, 198; 1871, § 766; 1880, §§ 1590, 1591, 1592; 1892, § 3455; 1906, § 3954; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2961; 1930, § 3007; 1942, § 1889.